District of Columbia statutes.
21-2075

Termination of proceedings.

The protected individual, conservator, or any other interested person may petition the court to terminate the conservatorship. A protected individual seeking termination is entitled to the same rights and procedures as in an original proceeding for a protective order. The court, upon determining after notice and hearing that the incapacity of the protected individual or the need for the protective arrangement has ceased, shall terminate the conservatorship. Upon termination, title to assets of the estate passes to the formerly protected individual or to successors. The order of termination shall provide for expenses of administration and direct the conservator to execute appropriate instruments to evidence the transfer.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2075.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-329 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).